Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.030

Terms—Vacancies.

Members shall serve three year terms. A legislative member shall serve as long as he or she is a member of the legislative body from which he or she was appointed. Each member will continue to serve until a successor is appointed. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

[ 1985 c 317 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 125 s 4; 1965 c 8 s 43.46.030. Prior: 1961 c 301 s 3.]